Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201160-2121
Terms, defined.

For
purposes of the Motorcycle Safety Education Act, unless the context otherwise
requires:

(1) Department means the Department of Motor Vehicles;

(2) Director means the Director of Motor Vehicles;

(3) Driving course means a driving
pattern used to aid students in learning the skills needed to safely operate
a motorcycle as part of a motorcycle safety course;

(4) Motorcycle safety course means
a curriculum of study which has been approved by the department designed to
teach drivers the skills and knowledge to safely operate a motorcycle;

(5) Motorcycle safety
instructor means any person who has successfully passed a motorcycle safety
instructor's course curriculum and is certified by the department to teach
a motorcycle safety course; and

(6) Motorcycle trainer means a person who is qualified
and certified by the department to teach another person to become a certified
motorcycle safety instructor in this state.

Laws 1981, LB 22, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 1089, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1984), § 60-2109;

Laws 1986, LB 1004, § 3;

Laws 2002, LB 93, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB170, § 5.